District of Columbia statutes.
28:9-802

Savings clause.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided in this part, the amendments made by the 2012 Act apply to a transaction or lien within its scope, even if the transaction or lien was entered into or created before the applicability date.

(b)

The 2012 Act does not affect an action, case, or proceeding commenced before the applicability date.

May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-302, § 2(s), 60 DCR 2688
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-302: Section 4 of D.C. Law 19-302 provided that the act shall apply as of July 1, 2013.